Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Larceny

§ 2501.
Grand larceny.

A person who steals from the actual or constructive possession of another, other than from his or her person, money, goods, chattels, bank notes, bonds, promissory notes, bills of exchange or other bills, orders, or certificates, or a book of accounts for or concerning money, or goods due or to become due or to be delivered, or a deed or writing containing a conveyance of land, or any other valuable contract in force, or a receipt, release or defeasance, writ, process, or public record, shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both, if the money or other property stolen exceeds $900.00 in value.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 5; 2005, No. 156 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2502.
Petit larceny.

For offenses mentioned in section 2501 of this title where the money or other property stolen does not exceed $900.00 in value, the court may sentence the person convicted to imprisonment for not more than one year or to pay a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 195, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 46, eff. April 9, 1974; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 6; 2005, No. 156 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 97.

§ 2503.
Larceny from the person.

A person who steals or attempts to steal from the person and custody of another, property, the subject of larceny, shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 2504.
Taking parcel of realty.

A person who by a trespass with intent to steal, takes and carries away anything of value that is parcel of the realty, or annexed thereto, and the property of another against his or her will, shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 2505.
Unauthorized use of boats or aircraft.

A person who, without the consent of the owner, takes, uses, operates, or removes, or causes to be taken, used, operated, or removed from a wharf, pier, anchorage, airfield, hanger, boathouse, or other building or from any place or locality on a private or public enclosure or space, a boat, other water-borne craft, or aircraft used for the transportation of persons or property upon water, or in the air, and operates, drives, uses, or causes the same to be operated, driven, or used for his or her own profit, pleasure, use, or purpose, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict prosecutions for grand larceny.

§ 2506.
Disposition of property upon arrest for larceny or robbery.

The officer who arrests a person charged as principal or accessory in robbery or larceny shall secure, if to be found, the property alleged to be stolen, and shall be answerable for the same, and shall annex a schedule thereof to his or her return. Upon conviction of the offender, the property shall be restored to the owner.

§ 2507.
Larceny conviction in burglary or robbery prosecution.

A person arraigned and tried for burglary or robbery may be convicted of larceny, if the jury finds that offense proved.

§ 2508.
Conviction of attempted larceny.

If, upon trial of a person for the offense of stealing from the person and custody of another, the evidence is not, in the opinion of the jury, sufficient to prove that offense, it may, upon sufficient evidence, convict such person of an attempt to commit such offense.

§ 2509.
Pleading and proof of money stolen.

In a complaint, information or indictment for larceny, in which it is necessary to make an averment as to money, bank bills, or promissory notes, issued or purporting to be issued by an incorporated bank or banking institution or currency authorized to be circulated and circulating as money, it shall be sufficient to describe such money, bank bills, bank notes, or currency, simply as money, without specifying any particular coin, bank bill, bank note, or currency.

So far as regards the description of property, such allegation shall be sustained by proof of any amount of coin or of any bank bill, bank note, or piece of currency, although the particular species of coin of which such amount was composed or the particular nature of such bank bill, bank note, or currency, is not proved.